Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
PART 7
COORDINATED SYSTEM OF PAYMENT FOR EARLY
INTERVENTION SERVICES FOR INFANTS AND TODDLERS

Editor's note:

This part 7 was added in 2007 and was not amended prior to 2008. The substantive provisions of this part 7 were repealed and reenacted in 2008, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For the text of this part 7 prior to 2008, consult the 2007 Colorado Revised Statutes. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

27-10.5-701 to 27-10.5-710. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part repealed, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 870, § 135, effective July 1.